Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0291.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 3406ww. (1) An insurer that delivers, issues for delivery, or renews in this state a health insurance policy shall provide coverage for all of the following: (a) All possible adverse consequences related to an enrollee's gender transition procedure or treatment, including any short- or long-term side effects of the procedure or treatment. (b) Any testing or screening necessary to monitor the mental and physical health of the enrollee on at least an annual basis. (c) Any procedure or treatment necessary to reverse the enrollee's gender transition procedure or treatment. (2) An insurer described in subsection (1) shall provide the coverage described in subsection (1) to an enrollee who has undergone a gender transition procedure or treatment regardless of whether the enrollee was an enrollee under the health insurance policy at the time of the procedure or treatment. (3) As used in this section: (a) "Gender transition" means a medical process by which an individual's anatomy, physiology, or mental state is treated or altered, including the removal of otherwise healthy organs or tissue, the introduction of implants or performance of other plastic surgery, hormone treatment, or the use of drugs, counseling, or therapy, for the purpose of furthering or assisting the individual's identification as a member of the opposite biological sex or group or demographic category that does not correspond to the individual's biological sex. (b) "Gender transition procedure or treatment" means a medical procedure or treatment performed or provided for the purpose of assisting an individual with gender transition.